pt-BR: Grau de qualidade da carne: Angus certificado; Kobe; Canner (USDA); Choice (USDA); Commercial (USDA); Cutter (USDA); Prime (USDA); Select (USDA); Standard (USDA); Utility (USDA); Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Outro
vi: Cấp độ phân loại chất lượng thịt: Đạt chuẩn Angus; Kobe; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Khác
hr-HR: Razred kvalitete mesa: Certificirani Angus; Kobe; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Ostalo
nb: Kvalitetsgrad for kjøtt: Angus-sertifisert; Kobe; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Annet
ko: 육질 등급: 앵거스 인증; 고베; USDA 캐너; USDA 초이스; USDA 커머셜; USDA 커터; USDA 프라임; USDA 셀렉트; USDA 스탠더드; USDA 유틸리티; 와규 A4; 와규 A5; 기타
nl: Kwaliteitsklasse vlees: Gecertificeerd Angus; Kobe; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Overige
th: เกรดคุณภาพเนื้อสัตว์: เนื้อแองกัสได้รับการรับรอง; เนื้อโกเบ; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; วากิว A4; วากิว A5; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Kakovostni razred mesa: Certificiran Angus; Kobe; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Drugo
bg-BG: Клас на качеството на месото: Сертифициран Ангус; Кобе; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Вагиу A4; Вагиу A5; Друго
pl: Klasa jakości mięsa: Certyfikowana wołowina Angus; Kobe; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Inne
el: Βαθμός ποιότητας κρέατος: Πιστοποιημένο Angus; Κόμπε; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Άλλο
cs: Třída kvality masa: Certifikovaný Angus; Kobe; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Jiné
zh-CN: 肉质等级: 安格斯认证; 神户牛肉; USDA 制罐级; USDA 特选级; USDA 商业级; USDA 切块级; USDA 极佳级; USDA 可选级; USDA 标准级; USDA 实用级; 和牛 A4; 和牛 A5; 其他
hu: Hús minőségi besorolása: Minősített Angus; Kobe; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Egyéb
en: Meat quality grade: Angus Certified; Kobe; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Other
ru: Класс качества мяса: Сертифицированный ангус; Кобе; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Вагю A4; Вагю A5; Другое
sv: Kvalitetsklass för kött: Angus-certifierad; Kobe; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Annat
zh-TW: 肉質等級: 安格斯認證; 神戶; USDA 製罐級 (Canner); USDA 特選級 (Choice); USDA 商業級 (Commercial); USDA 絞肉級 (Cutter); USDA 極佳級 (Prime); USDA 精選級 (Select); USDA 標準級 (Standard); USDA 實用級 (Utility); A4 和牛; A5 和牛; 其他
ja: 肉品質グレード: アンガス牛認定; 神戸牛; USDAキャナー; USDAチョイス; USDAコマーシャル; USDAカッター; USDAプライム; USDAセレクト; USDAスタンダード; USDAユーティリティ; 和牛 A4; 和牛 A5; その他
sk-SK: Trieda kvality mäsa: Certifikovaný Angus; Kobe; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Iné
fi: Lihan laatuluokka: Angus Certified; Kobe; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Muu
da: Grad af kødkvalitet: Angus-certificeret; Kobe; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Andet
tr: Et kalite derecesi: Sertifikalı Angus; Kobe; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Diğer
fr: Catégorie de qualité de la viande: Certifié Angus; Kobe; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Autre
es: Grado de calidad de la carne: Angus certificado; Kobe; Canner USDA; Choice USDA; Commercial USDA; Cutter USDA; Prime USDA; Select USDA; Standard USDA; Utility USDA; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Otro
de: Qualitätsstufe des Fleisches: Zertifiziertes Angus; Kobe; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Grad de calitate a cărnii: Certificare Angus; Kobe; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Altele
it: Grado di qualità della carne: Angus certificato; Kobe; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Altro
pt-PT: Grau de qualidade da carne: Angus certificado; Kobe; USDA Canner; USDA Choice; USDA Commercial; USDA Cutter; USDA Prime; USDA Select; USDA Standard; USDA Utility; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Outro
lt-LT: Mėsos kokybės klasė: Sertifikuota „Angus“; „Kobe“; USDA „Canner“; USDA „Choice“; USDA „Commercial“; USDA „Cutter“; USDA „Prime“; USDA „Select“; USDA „Standard“; USDA „Utility“; Wagyu A4; Wagyu A5; Kita